Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7403
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Unfair Discrimination Against Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act is to prohibit unfair discrimination by insurers on the basis of abuse.

Laws 1998, LB 1035, § 16.